Utah statutes.
10-18-304.   Eminent domain.

A municipality may not exercise its power of eminent domain to condemn plant and equipment of a private provider for the purpose of providing to a subscriber:

(1)  a cable television service; or

(2)  a public telecommunications service.



Enacted by Chapter 83, 2001 General Session

